Utah statutes.
41-6a-1011.   Pedestrian vehicles.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a) (i)  "Pedestrian vehicle" means a self-propelled conveyance designed, manufactured, and intended for the exclusive use of a person with a physical disability.

(ii)  A "pedestrian vehicle" may not:

(A)  exceed 48 inches in width;

(B)  have an engine or motor with more than 300 cubic centimeters displacement or with more than 12 brake horsepower; and

(C)  be capable of developing a speed in excess of 30 miles per hour.

(b)  "Physical disability" means any bodily impairment which precludes a person from walking or otherwise moving about as a pedestrian.

(2) (a)  A pedestrian vehicle operated by a physically disabled person is exempt from vehicle registration, inspection, and operator license requirements.

(b)  Authority to operate a pedestrian vehicle on public highways or sidewalks shall be granted according to rules promulgated by the commissioner of public safety.

(3) (a)  A physically disabled person may operate a pedestrian vehicle with a motor of not more than .5 brake horsepower capable of developing a speed of not more than eight miles per hour:

(i)  on the sidewalk; and

(ii)  in all places where pedestrians are allowed. 

(b)  A permit, license, registration, authority, application, or restriction may not be required or imposed on a physically disabled person operating a pedestrian vehicle under this Subsection (3).

(c)  The provisions of this Subsection (3) supercede the provision of Subsection (2)(b).

